Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.030

Organization registration.

(1) All international student exchange visitor placement organizations that place students in public schools in the state shall register with the secretary of state.

(2) Failure to register is a violation of this chapter.

(3) Information provided to the secretary of state under this chapter is a public record.

(4) Registration shall not be considered or be represented as an endorsement of the organization by the secretary of state or the state of Washington.

(5) On a date established by rule by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall provide annually to the superintendent of public instruction a list of all currently registered international student placement organizations. The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually the list of all currently registered international student placement organizations to all Washington state school districts.

[ 1995 c 60 s 1; 1991 c 128 s 3.]